District of Columbia statutes.
47-1383

Obtaining possession.

Subject to the rights of tenants under residential leases described in § 47-1382(a), a person who acquires a deed to real property under this chapter is entitled to issuance of a writ of possession of the real property as if the person had obtained a judgment awarding possession of the real property.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).